Maine, session 132, LD1700.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §10129, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 600, §5, is
further amended to read:
B. The accelerator may provide capital to qualified projects in the form of:
(1) Debt financing;
(2) Credit enhancements, including loan loss reserves and loan guarantees;
(3) Aggregation and warehousing;
(4) Equity capital;
(5) Any other financial product approved by the board; and
(6) Leases.; and
(7) Direct loans.
Sec. 2. Renewable energy generation and grid technology pilot project. The
Efficiency Maine Trust shall establish and administer a renewable energy generation and
grid technology pilot project, referred to in this section as "the pilot project," through the
Maine Clean Energy and Sustainability Accelerator, referred to in this section as "the
accelerator," as established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 35-A, section 10129,
subsection 2.
1. Notwithstanding any provision of Title 35-A, section 10129 to the contrary, the pilot
project must be designed to provide financing or investment from the accelerator to those
qualified projects for renewable energy generation, as described in Title 35-A, section
10129, subsection 1, paragraph I, subparagraph (1), and grid technology such as storage to
support clean energy distribution, including microgrids, as defined in Title 35-A, section
10129, subsection 1, paragraph H, and smart grid applications as described in Title 35-A,
section 3143.
Page 1 - 132LR2059(03)

2. Within 24 months of the effective date of this Act, and as long as sufficient funds
are available, the Efficiency Maine Trust must use no less than $1,000,000 of the funds
held by the accelerator to provide debt financing credit enhancements; aggregation and
warehousing; equity capital, including co-investments; leases; loans; or other financial
products approved by the Efficiency Maine Trust Board to creditworthy projects described
in subsection 1.
3. By January 29, 2028, the Efficiency Maine Trust shall provide a report regarding the
status of the pilot project to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over energy matters. The report must include an evaluation of the effectiveness
of the pilot project including a description of each project that received finance and
investment services. The trust may include recommendations regarding the continuation of
the pilot project in its report. The committee may report out a bill related to the report to
the Second Regular Session of the 133rd Legislature.
Page 2 - 132LR2059(03)